Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1 Department of Financial Institutions
45-1-118. Charter application costs — Annual banking fee — Assessments — Recovering the costs of examination and supervision.

Each state bank shall pay to the department the cost, as determined by the commissioner, of investigating an application by the bank for a charter as a new bank or for a branch bank.

The commissioner shall determine an annual budget for the department.

The amount of the budget attributable to the regulation and examination of state banks shall thereafter be divided among the state banks by the commissioner.

The assessment against each state bank, which shall be known as the banking fee, shall be allocated in proportion to the total assets beneficially owned by each state bank; provided, that:

The commissioner may establish a minimum assessment in lieu of any pro rata assessment, which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000); and

The maximum assessment shall not exceed the annualized fee that a state bank would pay if it were a national bank of equivalent asset size.

Nondepository trust companies that are regulated by the department shall, in lieu of a banking fee based on asset size, pay to the commissioner, by July 1 of each year, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each office operated by the trust company. In addition, nondepository trust companies shall pay the actual expenses of examination at the time of examination. The fees are payable in addition to other fees and taxes now required by law and are expendable receipts for the use of the commissioner in defraying a portion of the cost of administration of this chapter.

Assessments shall be paid into the state treasury upon notice from the commissioner, and all moneys collected by the commissioner shall be used for the administration of the department and for the department's sole use.

Any funds collected by the department but unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert or in any way be transferred to the general fund but shall be rebated to the state banks, within one hundred eighty (180) days, or shall be credited against the banking fee owed by the state banks for the current fiscal year.

If any state bank fails to make payment within thirty (30) days after notice from the commissioner of the amount of its assessment, the commissioner may issue an execution against its property for an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the delinquent payment.

The department may recover the costs of examination and supervision of a financial institution, subsidiary, or service corporation for supervision or examination that are in addition to the costs associated with the level of supervision ordinarily required for a financial institution in sound financial condition and that are in excess of the normal regulatory fees paid by the institution. The department may also recover the costs of any review of any affiliate of a financial institution determined by the department to have contributed to an unsafe or unsound practice at a financial institution, subsidiary, or service corporation.

The commissioner may issue orders and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the purpose of establishing and defining costs associated with complying with this subsection (f) and for the purpose of enforcing the recovery of the costs.

The commissioner, in cooperation with the department of human resources, shall on an annual basis conduct a review of the salaries of employees in the department. The review shall include a comparative analysis of salaries of the departmental employees, employees in similar state positions in bank regulatory agencies of other states, employees in federal regulatory agencies, similar employees in other Tennessee state departments, and employees in similar positions in the private sector. Based on the review or other factors including, but not limited to, staff turnover, qualifications, or availability of qualified employees, the commissioner shall make recommendations for changes in classifications, salary improvements, or both.

The commissioner shall establish, maintain, and review on a periodic basis a method for assessing the staffing needs for the department. The method shall include, but not be limited to, assessment of the statutory requirements of the department, the number and type of institutions regulated within each regulatory category, and the size of the assets under the departmental supervision in each category.

The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may, by regulation, establish the criteria and circumstances by which a credit toward the annual banking fee may be given to a Tennessee state-chartered bank for the annual banking fee assessment, if any, assessed against an out-of-state branch of the Tennessee state-chartered bank by the host state banking supervisory agency.

Persons regulated and supervised by the department's compliance division shall be assessed an annual supervision fee as described in this subsection (i).

Pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the commissioner shall determine an annual budget for the department. The commissioner shall determine the amount of the budget attributable to the regulation and examination of the persons regulated by the compliance division.

Mortgage loan originators, as defined in §§ 45-5-102 and 45-13-105, as applicable, shall not be assessed the annual supervision fee, but mortgage loan originators shall continue to pay the licensing, renewal and any other fees required in chapters 5 and 13 of this title. The total number of mortgage loan originators licensed with the department at the end of the previous fiscal year shall be multiplied by the annual renewal fee for mortgage loan originators, and the product shall be deducted from the compliance division's budget. The remaining amount of the compliance division's budget shall be allocated as described in subdivision (i)(4).

The commissioner shall periodically determine the per diem costs of conducting a routine examination of persons regulated and supervised by the compliance division.

After deducting the amounts referenced in subdivision (i)(3), the remaining budget shall be assessed as a supervision fee among all licensed and registered locations based on the relative complexities of examining and regulating each industry.

Payment of the supervision fee calculated in this subsection (i) shall be a condition of licensure or registration renewal. The supervision fee shall be nonrefundable and no abatement of the supervision fee shall be made if the license or registration is surrendered, cancelled, revoked or suspended prior to the expiration of the period for which it was issued.

The supervision fee includes annual licensing and registration fees and the costs for a routine examination or investigation of a licensee or registrant regulated by the compliance division.

In addition to the supervision fee, a licensee or registrant shall pay the actual expenses incurred for out-of-state examinations and inspections of books, records, and papers maintained out-of-state.

In addition to the supervision fee, the commissioner may impose a special assessment upon a licensee or registrant for the purpose of recovering costs in excess of those costs normally incurred for conducting a routine examination.

A person who applies for a new license or registration shall pay, as a condition of licensure or registration, the same supervision fee for each licensed or registered location as a person holding the same license or registration type has paid as a supervision fee during that fiscal year. If the supervision fee for a fiscal year has not yet been determined, the person applying for a new license or registration shall pay, as a condition of licensure or registration, the supervision fee required to obtain the license or registration type in the previous fiscal year, except as designated in subdivision (i)(8).

A person submitting an application to the compliance division for a new license or registration from July 1, 2015 through September 30, 2015, shall pay a supervision fee of five hundred dollars ($500). Thereafter, the supervision fee shall be an amount determined by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (i)(4).

All funds collected by the department's compliance division shall be used for the administration of that division.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.110); 1973, ch. 294, § 16; T.C.A., § 45-117; Acts 1988, ch. 655, § 1; 1992, ch. 628, § 1; 1993, ch. 233, § 1; 1995, ch. 451, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 562, § 4; 1999, ch. 112, § 2; 2014, ch. 736, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

45-1-119. Annual report.

The commissioner shall report to the governor annually within sixty (60) days after the end of each calendar year. The report shall include:

The text of all rules of the department of general application adopted or altered since the commissioner's last previous report;

Recommendations for legislation;

A statement of the status and remaining assets and liabilities of all banking organizations in the possession of the commissioner;

A summary of all changes occurring since the commissioner's last previous report by reason of opening new state banks, mergers and conversions, increases and decreases in capital and the like; and

A combined statement of condition of all state banks as of the date of the most recent reports of condition rendered to the commissioner, and reference to the availability in the commissioner's office of the statements of condition of each state bank, as of the date of the most recent reports to the commissioner.

Copies of the last annual report not previously so submitted shall be available to the general assembly at the opening of each regular session.

The annual report of the commissioner may be published on the order of the governor, if the governor deems the report to be of sufficient importance to the public.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.111); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-118; Acts 2003, ch. 253, § 1.

45-1-120. Records of department.

No information from the records of the department shall be revealed without the consent of the commissioner.

Reports of examinations made by the department shall be retained for five (5) years.

A copy of any document on file with the department that is certified by the commissioner as being a true copy may be introduced in evidence as if it were the original. The commissioner shall establish a schedule of fees for copies of documents.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.112); 1973, ch. 294, §§ 6, 17; T.C.A., § 45-119; Acts 1993, ch. 22, § 7.

45-1-121. Traveling expenses.

The necessary traveling expenses in the discharge of the duties of the commissioner and examiners employed by the commissioner shall be audited by the commissioner of finance and administration and shall be paid monthly by warrants drawn by the commissioner of finance and administration on the state treasurer in favor of the commissioner of financial institutions.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.113); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-120.

45-1-122. Suits to vacate and annul bank charters.

In addition to other remedies provided in this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, the commissioner of financial institutions, in the name of the state, is authorized to institute a quo warranto, or other appropriate proceedings, to vacate and annul the charter of any bank where the bank has done or permitted such act or acts as under the law authorized a vacation of its charter, and no suit shall be instituted by any person to vacate the charter of any bank except by the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.114); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-121.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

45-1-123. Legal counsel for commissioner.

The district attorneys general in each county, when requested by the commissioner, shall, as a part of their official duty and without compensation, represent the commissioner in any suit that the commissioner may desire to bring, or that may be brought against the commissioner, in the commissioner's official capacity, in their respective counties.

The attorney general and reporter shall advise the commissioner on any question of law submitted to the attorney general and reporter by the commissioner, respecting the commissioner's authority and duties under the law.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.115); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; modified; T.C.A., § 45-122.

Cross-References. Submission of criminal violation of banking law to district attorneys general by commissioner, §45-2-1717.

45-1-124. Application of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title.

The existence of state banks formed or existing on April 2, 1969, shall not be impaired by the enactment of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, or by any change in the requirements for the formation of state banks, or by any amendment or repeal of the laws under which they were formed or created, and except as otherwise expressly provided in those chapters, the repeal of a prior act or acts by those chapters shall not affect any right accrued or established, or any liability or penalty incurred, under the act, prior to the repeal of the act.

To the full extent consistent with such rights, liabilities, and penalties, all state banks and, to the extent applicable, all banks, shall hereafter be operated in accordance with this chapter and chapter 2 of this title. Unless the commissioner determines otherwise, this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, and the rules of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, shall also apply to the operation and regulation of state trust companies and banks whose purposes and powers are limited to fiduciary purposes and powers.

All powers granted in this chapter and chapter 2 of this title may be freely exercised by any corporation, which is empowered by its charter under any prior act of the general assembly and any amendments thereto, to exercise the rights and powers that appertain and belong to a banking institution or to conduct a general banking business, without the necessity of amending its charter, unless the charter expressly prohibits the exercise of such powers.

Except to the extent inconsistent with or contrary to specific provisions of chapters 1, 2 and 3 of this title, Tennessee state banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, and savings banks, and their directors, officers and shareholders shall be governed by and subject to the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, as the same may be amended from time to time, and successor statutes thereto. The commissioner has the authority to interpret the Tennessee Business Corporation Act as it applies to financial institutions subject to regulation by the commissioner.

The charter of a trust company granted by the commissioner shall not be void due to the enactment of any amendment or repeal of the laws under which it was formed if the trust company is in operation, as determined by the commissioner, on July 1, 1999.

A company engaged in activities subject to this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, on July 1, 1999, but formed, as determined by the commissioner, prior to the enactment of chapter 620 of the Public Acts of 1980, and not previously subject to regulation by the commissioner, may continue to act as a fiduciary without submitting an application. However, the entity shall be otherwise fully subject to this chapter and chapter 2 of this title.

A company authorized by its charter, prior to the enactment of chapter 620 of the Public Acts of 1980, to engage in fiduciary activities, but not engaging in fiduciary activities on July 1, 1999, must file the appropriate application to establish a trust company and then fully comply with this chapter and chapter 2 of this title.

All state trust companies operating on July 1, 1999, shall have a period of time that the commissioner determines to be reasonable and prudent to conform to the requirements of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title and the regulations under this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, but the period shall not exceed three (3) years from July 1, 1999. During this period of time, to conform to the requirements of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, the commissioner may conduct examinations at the company's expense, and apply the requirements of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title as deemed appropriate.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (1.104); T.C.A., § 45-123; Acts 1980, ch. 620, § 3; 1994, ch. 551, § 2; 1999, ch. 112, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Section 5 of Acts 1980, ch. 620 reads:

“The existence and operation of any trust company formed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be impaired by the enactment of this act.”

45-1-125. Liability of director or officer of financial institution in receivership or reorganization.

A director or officer, including a former director or officer of a financial institution, shall not be liable to the financial institution in receivership or reorganization or to the receiver, shareholders, depositors or creditors of the closed financial institution for money damages for breach of fiduciary duty, unless the claim or action arises out of the breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the financial institution or for acts or omissions not in good faith or that involved intentional misconduct or knowing violation of the law by the director or officer during the director's or officer's term of office with the financial institution. For purposes of this section, “financial institution” means a bank organized under the laws of this state, a national bank with its principal office in this state, a savings and loan association or savings bank organized under the laws of this state, or a federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank with its principal office in this state. This section shall apply both retrospectively and prospectively.

Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 3.

45-1-126. Compliance review documents — Confidentiality.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Compliance review committee” means:

An audit, loan review or compliance committee appointed by the board of directors of a depository institution; or

Any other person to the extent the person acts in an investigatory capacity at the direction of a compliance review committee; and

Whose functions are to evaluate and seek to improve:

Loan underwriting standards;

Asset quality;

Financial reporting to federal or state regulatory agencies; or

Compliance with federal or state statutory or regulatory requirements;

“Compliance review documents” means documents prepared for or created by a compliance review committee;

“Depository institution” means a state bank, national bank, state or federal savings and loan association, or a state or federal savings bank located in this state that is authorized to maintain deposit or share accounts;

“Loan review committee” means a person or group of persons who, on behalf of a depository institution, reviews loans held by the institution for the purpose of assessing the credit quality of the loans, compliance with the institution's loan policies, and compliance with applicable laws and regulations; and

“Person” means an individual, group of individuals, board, committee, partnership, firm, association, corporation or other entity.

Except as provided in subsection (c):

Compliance review documents are confidential and are not discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action arising out of matters evaluated by the compliance review committee; and

Compliance review documents delivered to a federal or state governmental agency remain confidential and are not discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action arising out of matters evaluated by the compliance review committee.

Subsection (b) does not apply to any information required by statute or regulation to be maintained by or provided to a governmental agency while the information is in the possession of the governmental agency to the extent applicable law expressly authorizes its disclosure.

Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 18.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

45-1-127. Fiduciary responsibilities or liabilities of financial institutions, officers or employees.

No financial institution or officer or employee thereof shall be deemed or implied to be acting as fiduciary or have a fiduciary obligation or responsibility to its customers or to other parties, other than shareholders of the institution, unless there is a written agency or trust agreement under which the financial institution specifically agrees to act and perform in the capacity of a fiduciary. The fiduciary responsibility and liability of a financial institution or any officer or employee of a financial institution shall be limited solely to performance under the contract and shall not extend beyond the scope of the contract. Any claim for a breach of a fiduciary responsibility of a financial institution or any officer or employee thereof may only be asserted within the time provided in § 48-18-601.

For purposes of this section, “financial institution” means a state or national bank, a savings and loan association, savings bank, industrial loan and thrift company, or mortgage lender.

It is the legislative intent that this section is not intended to restrict, alter, or modify a court's application of the equitable doctrines of resulting or constructive trusts.

It is the further legislative intent that this section shall be applied only to transactions or relationships that are entered into after May 10, 1994; provided, that any transaction or relationship that may have existed prior to May 10, 1994, may be ratified, altered, or amended by meeting the requirements of this section.

Acts 1994, ch. 955, § 1.

45-1-128. [Reserved.]

All applications required to be submitted to the commissioner under chapters 2, 3 and 14 of this title or any regulations promulgated under these chapters, may be submitted by electronic communications, including, but not limited to, facsimile transmissions and electronic mail. Applications submitted in this manner shall be deemed complete for purposes of processing as of the date the electronic submission is received by the commissioner, as long as any filing fees or original documents required to be submitted with the application are received by the commissioner within three (3) business days of the electronic communication. If the application is incomplete, the commissioner may request additional information and the time for processing shall date from the receipt of the information.

Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which enacted this section, is known as and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-1-130. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and each board, commission, agency, or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 11; 2012, ch. 952, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.